Illinois, session 104th, HB545.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Procurement of Domestic Products Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 517/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Procurement of Domestic Products Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-954, eff. 1-1-05.)